Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1512
Manslaughter; allegations; sufficiency.

In any indictment for manslaughter, it shall not be necessary to set forth the manner in which, or the means by which, the death was caused; but it shall be sufficient to charge that the defendant did unlawfully kill and slay the deceased.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 425, p. 819;

R.S.1913, § 9061;

C.S.1922, § 10085;

C.S.1929, § 29-1512;

R.S.1943, § 29-1512.

Information drawn in language of statute is sufficient to charge manslaughter arising from leaving motor vehicle illegally parked on highway. Vaca v. State, 150 Neb. 516, 34 N.W.2d 873 (1948).

In charging crime of manslaughter, it is not necessary to set forth the manner or means by which death was caused. Anderson v. State, 150 Neb. 116, 33 N.W.2d 362 (1948).

This section is constitutional, and any information drawn in the language of the statute is sufficient to properly charge the crime. Puckett v. State, 144 Neb. 876, 15 N.W.2d 63 (1944); Cowan v. State, 140 Neb. 837, 2 N.W.2d 111 (1942).